Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.250

Nominations for election to commodity board—When only one nominee.

For the purpose of nominating candidates for board memberships, the director shall call separate meetings of the affected producers and handlers within the affected area and in case elections shall be by districts the director shall call separate meetings for each district. However, at the inception any marketing agreement or order nominations may be at the issuance hearing. Nomination meetings shall be called annually and at least thirty days in advance of the date set for the election of board members. Notice of every such meeting shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the affected area defined in the order or agreement not less than ten days in advance of the date of such meeting and in addition, written notice of every such meeting shall be given to all on the list of affected parties or affected producers and/or handlers, whichever is applicable. However, if the agreement or order provides for election by districts such written notice need be given only to the producers or handlers residing in or whose principal place of business is within such district. Nonreceipt of notice by any interested person shall not invalidate proceedings at such meetings. Any qualified person may be nominated orally for membership upon such board at the said meetings. Nominations may also be made within five days after any such meeting by written petition filed with the director signed by not less than five producers or handlers, as the case may be, entitled to have participated in said meeting.

If the board moves and the director approves that the nomination meeting procedure be deleted, the director shall give notice of the vacancy by mail to all affected producers or handlers. The notice shall call for nominations in accordance with the marketing order or agreement and shall give the final date for filing nominations which shall not be less than twenty days after the notice was mailed.

Not more than one board member may be part of the same "person" as defined by this chapter. When only one nominee is nominated for any position on the board, the director shall determine whether the nominee meets the qualifications for the position and, if so, the director shall declare the nominee elected or appoint the nominee to the position.

[ 2002 c 313 s 26; 1987 c 393 s 7; 1985 c 261 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 5; 1961 c 256 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.